Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1629
Commissioner decision; person aggrieved; right to hearing and review.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the commissioner respecting denial of an authorization to operate or of an agent's permit or the placing of conditions on either shall have the right to a hearing and review of such decision by the board as provided in sections 85-1630 to 85-1632.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 29;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2829;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 29.